Wyoming statutes. Title 1 Code of Civil Procedure
Article 6. Informal Procedure for Disputes Involving Limited Amounts

Law reviews. —

For comment, “Wyoming Eminent Domain Act: Comment on the Act and Rule 71.1 of the Wyoming Rules of Civil Procedure,” see XVIII Land & Water L. Rev. 739 (1983).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

27 Am. Jur. 2d Eminent Domain §§ 414 to 738.

29A C.J.S. Eminent Domain §§ 201 to 374.

§ 1-26-601.
Informal claims procedure authorized.

This article applies
whenever only the amount of compensation is in dispute and the total
compensation demanded by any condemnee is less than twenty thousand
dollars ($20,000.00), excluding interest and costs, or the difference
between the latest offer of the condemnor and the latest demand by
any condemnee is less than five thousand dollars ($5,000.00). The
supreme court may adopt rules governing proceedings under this article.

History.

Laws 1981, ch. 174, § 1.

§ 1-26-602.
Request for informal procedure.

A party may file with
the court a written request that the issue of the amount of compensation
be determined under this article, identifying the property and setting
forth the amount of the condemnor’s latest offer and the condemnee’s
latest demand for compensation.

History.

Laws 1981, ch. 174, § 1.

§ 1-26-603.
Hearing.

If the court determines that the request should be granted, it shall hold a hearing upon reasonable notice to the parties to determine compensation.

The court shall proceed without a jury and in an informal manner. The parties may present oral and documentary proof and may argue in support of their respective positions but the rules of evidence need not be followed. Neither party is required to offer the opinion of an expert or to be represented by an attorney. Unless demanded by a party and at his own expense, a record of testimony received at the hearing need not be kept.

Costs shall be claimed and taxed as in other condemnation actions. Upon entry of judgment, the clerk shall serve upon the parties a copy of the judgment with notice of its entry, together with instructions as to the procedure for demanding a retrial.

History.

Laws 1981, ch. 174, § 1.

§ 1-26-604.
Demand for retrial.

Either party, within thirty (30) days after entry of the judgment, may reject the judgment and file a written demand for trial. The action shall be restored to the docket of the court as though proceedings under this article had not occurred.

If the condemnor files a demand under subsection (a) of this section and ultimately obtains a judgment no more favorable to him, the court may require him to pay, in addition to costs, the condemnee’s litigation expenses incurred after the demand was filed.

History.

Laws 1981, ch. 174, § 1.